Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 1. Generally
§ 41-3-115.
Applications for use of water outside the state.

The legislature finds, recognizes and declares that the transfer of water outside the boundaries of the state may have a significant impact on the water and other resources of the state. Further, this impact may differ substantially from that caused by uses of the water within the state. Therefore, all water being the property of the state and part of the natural resources of the state, it shall be controlled and managed by the state for the purposes of protecting, conserving and preserving to the state the maximum permanent beneficial use of the state’s waters.

None of the water of the state either surface or underground may be appropriated, stored or diverted for use outside of the state or for use as a medium of transportation of mineral, chemical or other products to another state without the specific prior approval of the legislature. Provided, however, neither approval by the legislature nor compliance with the application procedures under subsections (m) through (r) of this section shall be required for appropriations that will transfer or use outside the state less than one thousand (1,000) acre-feet of water per year unless the applications are part of a collection of related applications or appropriations from the same source of supply for the same or similar use where the total use or transfer outside the state exceeds one thousand (1,000) acre-feet per year in aggregate. The state engineer is authorized to adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this subsection.

No holder of either a permit to appropriate water or a certificate to appropriate water, nor any applicant for a right to appropriate the unappropriated water of this state, may transfer or use the water so appropriated, certificated or applied for outside the state of Wyoming without prior approval of the legislature of Wyoming.

through (k) Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 4, § 1.

Applications for the appropriation of water for use out of state shall be submitted to the state engineer. The application shall contain sufficient information to enable the state engineer to fully analyze the proposed appropriation. Within sixty (60) days of receipt of the application, the state engineer shall determine if the application is complete and acceptable. If the application is unacceptable, the state engineer shall notify the applicant as to what is needed so an acceptable application may be submitted.

Upon determination that the application is acceptable, the state engineer shall cause to be made, at the applicant’s expense, a comprehensive review of the application. The state engineer shall have no more than one hundred twenty (120) days to complete this review.

Upon completion of the state engineer’s review, the state engineer shall issue a preliminary analysis of the application. The analysis shall address the factors set forth in subsection (r) of this section, contain a summary of the application and any other information the state engineer deems relevant. The preliminary opinion, or a reasonable summary, shall be published, at the applicant’s expense, for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the proposed appropriation of water is located. At the conclusion of the publication period, the state engineer shall hold a public hearing, at the applicant’s expense, in the county where the proposed appropriation is located.

In rendering a final opinion, the state engineer shall consider all comments received at the public hearing and those received in writing within twenty (20) days of the public hearing.

The state engineer shall render a final opinion and submit it to the legislature within one hundred twenty (120) days of the public hearing. The final opinion shall address all factors set forth in subsection (r) of this section and shall contain a recommendation that the legislature grant or deny the proposed out-of-state use.

The legislature shall consider the proposed appropriation following receipt of the state engineer’s opinion and recommendation. Notwithstanding subsections (d) through (k) of this section, legislative consent for the proposed appropriation of water for use out of the state shall be based upon consideration of the factors necessary to assure meeting the state’s interests in conserving and preserving its water resources for the maximum beneficial use. Factors to be considered by the legislature shall include the following:

The amount of water proposed to be appropriated and the proposed uses;

The amount of water available for appropriation from the proposed source, and the natural characteristics of the source;

The economic, social, environmental and other benefits to be derived by the state from the proposed appropriation;

The benefits to the state by the use of the water within the state that will be foregone by the proposed appropriation;

The benefits presently and prospectively derived from the return flow of water in intrastate use which will be eliminated by the proposed out-of-state use;

The injury to existing water rights of other appropriators that may result from the proposed use;

Whether the use formulated and carried out promotes or enhances the purposes and policies of the state’s water development plans and water resources policy, and that the use will not unreasonably interfere with other planned uses or developments for which a permit has been or may be issued;

Whether the proposed use will significantly impair the state’s interest and ability to preserve and conserve sufficient quantities of water for reasonably foreseeable consumptive uses and other beneficial uses recognized by law to include but not limited to domestic, livestock, agricultural, municipal and industrial purposes;

Whether the proposed use will adversely affect the quantity or quality of water available for domestic or municipal use;

Whether, to the greatest extent possible, the correlation between surface water and groundwater has been determined, to avoid possible harmful effects of the proposed use on the supply of either.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with compacts, court decrees and treaty obligations.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 25, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-10.5; Laws 1982, ch. 58, § 1; 1983, ch. 167, § 1; 1985, ch. 4, § 1; 1998, ch. 34, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2013 ch. 14, § 1, effective February 12, 2013.

The 2010 amendment,

in (s), substituted “section” for “act.”.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2013 amendment,

added the language “unless the applications are part of a collection of related applications or appropriations from the same source of supply for the same or similar use where the total use or transfer outside the state exceeds one thousand (1,000) acre-feet per year in aggregate” and added the last sentence in (b).

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Severability. —

Laws 1974, ch. 25, § 5, reads: “If any provision of this act is held to be unconstitutional, such a ruling shall not affect other provisions of the act which can be given effect without the unconstitutional provision, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Law reviews. —

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters?,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

For comment, “Allocating Buried Treasure: Federal Litigation Involving Interstate Ground Water,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 103 (1976).

For article, “So Its Not ‘Ours’ — Why Can't We Still Keep It? A First Look at Sporhase v. Nebraska,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 137 (1983).

For comment, “Sporhase v. Nebraska ex rel. Douglas: State Control of Water Under the Constraints of the Commerce Clause,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1983).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
113.06 (Matthew Bender).

§ 41-3-116.
Permit for watering livestock on federal land.

As used in this section:

“Allotment” means a designated area of federal land available for livestock grazing;

“Animal unit month” or “AUM” means the amount of forage needed to sustain one (1) cow and her calf, one (1) horse or five (5) sheep or goats for one (1) month;

“Federal agency” means the United States, the President of the United States and any department, corporation, agency or instrumentality heretofore or hereafter created, designated or established by the United States;

“Grazing permit” means a permit, lease or other document authorizing livestock to graze on an allotment;

“Livestock” means as defined by W.S. 11-22-101(a)(ii) but does not include wild horses claimed by the federal government under the federal Wild Free-Roaming Horses and Burros Act, P.L. 92-195.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title regarding permits to appropriate water, any permit issued for the purposes of watering livestock on an allotment shall:

Only be issued in the name of a federal agency jointly with a person or grazing association who has the right to use a grazing permit;

Be appurtenant to the allotment or land on which the livestock is watered;

Not be changed under W.S.

41-3-104

or amended under W.S.

41-4-514

without seeking the consent of the holder or holders of a valid grazing permit to graze livestock on the allotment.

Any permit issued jointly in the name of a federal agency and a grazing permit holder under this section may be transferred to a different person or grazing association that receives an allotment or grazing permit on that federal land by filing for a permit assignment accompanied by documentary evidence to the state engineer’s office.

Notwithstanding W.S.

41-3-401

, no appropriation for the purpose of livestock watering on an allotment is subject to abandonment or partial abandonment if:

The nonuse is caused by, in whole or in part, a federal agency’s reduction of the AUMs on the allotment; or

The nonuse is voluntary because a grazing permit holder chooses not to graze livestock on that allotment, provided that the nonuse shall not exceed five (5) successive years.

Nothing in this section shall affect any livestock water right or permit held by a federal agency on or before July 1, 2022.

History.

2022 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 28, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.